Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ga_IE.aff
SFX I Y 11
SFX I   im    nn          laim
SFX I   0     id          laim
SFX I   im    dh          laim
SFX I   im    0          laim
SFX I   aim   faidh       laim
SFX I   aim   faimid      laim
SFX I   aim   far         laim
SFX I   m     gí          laim
SFX I   0     is          laim
SFX I   m     dís         laim
SFX I   laim  iltear      laim

SFX J Y 13
SFX J   inn   mar         lainn
SFX J   inn   dh          lainn
SFX J   nn    mis         lainn
SFX J   nn    dís         lainn
SFX J   ainn  fainn       lainn
SFX J   ainn  fá          lainn
SFX J   ainn  fadh        lainn
SFX J   ainn  faimis      lainn
SFX J   ainn  faidís      lainn
SFX J   ainn  faí         lainn
SFX J   inn   dar         lainn
SFX J   lainn ilteá       lainn
SFX J   lainn iltí        lainn

SFX K Y 11
SFX K   0     ín          .
SFX K   0     sa          .
SFX K   0     se          .
SFX K   0     na          .
SFX K   0     ne          .
SFX K   0     -sa       .
SFX K   0     -se       .
SFX K   0     -na       .
SFX K   0     -ne       .
SFX K   0     -san      .
SFX K   0     -sean     .
