Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ga_IE.dic
adharcálaim/UI
adharcálainn/J
aerálaim/UI
aerálainn/J
anótálaim/UI
anótálainn/J
armálaim/UI
armálainn/J
athbhlocálaim/UI
athbhlocálainn/J
athbhútálaim/UI
athbhútálainn/J
athchóipeálaim/UI
athchóipeálainn/J
athchúrsálaim/UI
athchúrsálainn/J
athdhálaim/UI
athdhálainn/J
athphlandálaim/UI
athphlandálainn/J
babhlálaim/USI
babhtálaim/USI
badrálaim/USI
baghcatálaim/USI
baiceálaim/USI
bancálaim/USI
baoiteálaim/USI
batrálaim/USI
bhabhlálainn/JU
bhabhtálainn/JU
bhadrálainn/JU
bhaghcatálainn/JU
bhaiceálainn/JU
bhancálainn/JU
bhaoiteálainn/JU
bhatrálainn/JU
bhilleálainn/JU
bhleaisteálainn/JU
bhlocálainn/JU
bhobálainn/JU
bhocsálainn/JU
bhocálainn/JU
bholtálainn/JU
bhordálainn/JU
bhrabhsálainn/JU
bhraigeálainn/JU
bhrainseálainn/JU
bhrandálainn/JU
bhruiseálainn/JU
bhrásálainn/JU
bhréitseálainn/JU
bhuamálainn/JU
bhurdálainn/JU
bhurlálainn/JU
bhácálainn/JU
bhúclálainn/JU
billeálaim/USI
bleaisteálaim/USI
blocálaim/USI
bobálaim/USI
bocsálaim/USI
bocálaim/USI
boltálaim/USI
bordálaim/USI
brabhsálaim/USI
braigeálaim/USI
brainseálaim/USI
brandálaim/USI
bruiseálaim/USI
brásálaim/USI
bréitseálaim/USI
buamálaim/USI
burdálaim/USI
burlálaim/USI
bácálaim/USI
búclálaim/USI
cabálaim/USI
caibeálaim/USI
campálaim/USI
canbhásálaim/USI
cantálaim/USI
cardálaim/USI
ceantálaim/USI
ceáfrálaim/USI
chabálainn/JU
chaibeálainn/JU
champálainn/JU
chanbhásálainn/JU
chantálainn/JU
chardálainn/JU
cheantálainn/JU
cheáfrálainn/JU
chiceálainn/JU
chiondálainn/JU
chiúálainn/JU
chlabhtálainn/JU
chlibeálainn/JU
chliceálainn/JU
chlogálainn/JU
chluicheálainn/JU
chlónálainn/JU
chniotálainn/JU
chocálainn/JU
chomhghlasálainn/JU
chonálainn/JU
chorcálainn/JU
chorrsheiceálainn/JU
chostálainn/JU
chraiceálainn/JU
chrampálainn/JU
chreimneálainn/JU
chreimseálainn/JU
chrosálainn/JU
chrágálainn/JU
chróiseálainn/JU
chrúbálainn/JU
chrúcálainn/JU
chrústálainn/JU
chuileálainn/JU
chuilteálainn/JU
chácálainn/JU
chíorlálainn/JU
chócarálainn/JU
chóimeálainn/JU
chóipeálainn/JU
chóireálainn/JU
chótálainn/JU
chúblálainn/JU
chúigleálainn/JU
chúinneálainn/JU
chúplálainn/JU
chúrsálainn/JU
ciceálaim/USI
ciondálaim/USI
ciúálaim/USI
clabhtálaim/USI
clibeálaim/USI
cliceálaim/USI
clogálaim/USI
cluicheálaim/USI
clónálaim/USI
cniotálaim/USI
cocálaim/USI
comhghlasálaim/USI
conálaim/USI
corcálaim/USI
corrsheiceálaim/USI
costálaim/USI
craiceálaim/USI
crampálaim/USI
creimneálaim/USI
creimseálaim/USI
crosálaim/USI
crágálaim/USI
cróiseálaim/USI
crúbálaim/USI
crúcálaim/USI
crústálaim/USI
cuileálaim/USI
cuilteálaim/USI
cácálaim/USI
cíorlálaim/USI
cócarálaim/USI
cóimeálaim/USI
cóipeálaim/USI
cóireálaim/USI
cótálaim/USI
cúblálaim/USI
cúigleálaim/USI
cúinneálaim/USI
cúrsálaim/USI
d'achtálainn/JU
d'adharcálainn/JU
d'aerálainn/JU
d'anótálainn/JU
d'armálainn/JU
d'athbhlocálainn/JU
d'athbhútálainn/JU
d'athchóipeálainn/JU
d'athchúrsálainn/JU
d'athdhálainn/JU
d'athphlandálainn/JU
d'easpórtálainn/JU
d'eitseálainn/JU
d'fhacsálainn/J
d'fhaidhpeálainn/J
d'fhaoileálainn/J
d'fhodhálainn/J
d'fhorcálainn/J
d'fhorálainn/J
d'fhrainceálainn/J
d'fhriothálainn/J
d'fhuipeálainn/J
d'fhíneálainn/J
d'fhónálainn/J
d'fhórsálainn/J
d'fhótachóipeálainn/J
d'fhútrálainn/J
d'iarnálainn/JU
d'imdhálainn/JU
d'iompórtálainn/JU
d'ionramhálainn/JU
d'iontrálainn/JU
d'ofrálainn/JU
d'uaslódálainn/JU
d'íoslódálainn/JU
d'óstálainn/JU
dambálaim/USI
dearnálaim/USI
dhambálainn/JU
dhearnálainn/JU
dhifreálainn/JU
dhiogálainn/JU
dhornálainn/JU
dhraenálainn/JU
dhraoibeálainn/JU
dhreideálainn/JU
dhrugálainn/JU
dhruileálainn/JU
dhumpálainn/JU
dhurdálainn/JU
dhéchliceálainn/JU
dhí-armálainn/JU
dhíghlasálainn/JU
dhíliostálainn/JU
dhílódálainn/JU
dhíotálainn/JU
dhíphlugálainn/JU
dhíshuiteálainn/JU
dhópálainn/JU
difreálaim/USI
diogálaim/USI
dornálaim/USI
draenálaim/USI
draoibeálaim/USI
dreideálaim/USI
drugálaim/USI
druileálaim/USI
dumpálaim/USI
durdálaim/USI
dustálaim/USI
déchliceálaim/USI
déileálaim/USI
dí-armálaim/USI
díchóimeálaim/USI
díghlasálaim/USI
díghrúpálaim/USI
díliostálaim/USI
díluachálaim/USI
dílódálaim/USI
díobhálaim/USI
díotálaim/USI
díphacálaim/USI
díphlugálaim/USI
díscriúálaim/USI
díshuiteálaim/USI
dóibeálaim/USI
dópálaim/USI
dúblálaim/USI
easpórtálaim/UI
easpórtálainn/J
eitseálaim/UI
facsálaim/USI
faidhpeálaim/USI
faoileálaim/USI
fhacsálainn/JU
fhaoileálainn/JU
fhorcálainn/JU
fhrainceálainn/JU
fhuipeálainn/JU
fhónálainn/JU
fhótachóipeálainn/JU
fodhálaim/USI
forcálaim/USI
forálaim/USI
frainceálaim/USI
friothálaim/USI
fuipeálaim/USI
fíneálaim/USI
fónálaim/USI
fórsálaim/USI
fótachóipeálaim/USI
fútrálaim/USI
gardálaim/USI
geafálaim/USI
ghardálainn/JU
ghiosálainn/JU
ghligleálainn/JU
ghliogálainn/JU
ghothálainn/JU
ghreanálainn/JU
ghrábhálainn/JU
ghrátálainn/JU
ghrúpálainn/JU
ghíorálainn/JU
giosálaim/USI
glasálaim/USI
gligleálaim/USI
glinneálaim/USI
gliogálaim/USI
gliúálaim/USI
gothálaim/USI
grabálaim/USI
greanálaim/USI
greasálaim/USI
grábhálaim/USI
gráinseálaim/USI
grátálaim/USI
grúntálaim/USI
grúpálaim/USI
guailleálaim/USI
gíorálaim/USI
gófrálaim/USI
haigleálaim/I
haigleálainn/J
iarnálaim/UI
imdhálaim/UI
imdhálainn/J
iompórtálaim/UI
ionramhálaim/UI
ionramhálainn/J
iontrálaim/UI
labálaim/I
labálainn/J
lainseálaim/I
lamhálaim/I
lamhálainn/J
landálaim/I
lastálaim/I
lastálainn/J
leictreaphlátálaim/I
linseálaim/I
linseálainn/J
liostálaim/I
liúdrálaim/I
liúdrálainn/J
logálaim/I
luachálaim/I
luachálainn/J
ládálaim/I
láimhseálaim/I
láimhseálainn/J
líneálaim/I
lódálaim/I
lódálainn/J
lóisteálaim/I
lúbálaim/I
lúbálainn/J
lútálaim/I
mapálaim/SI
mapálainn/J
marcálaim/SI
meaitseálaim/SI
meaitseálainn/J
mharcálainn/J
mhineastrálainn/J
mháirseálainn/J
mineastrálaim/SI
mineastrálainn/J
muilleálaim/SI
máirseálaim/SI
máirseálainn/J
mámálaim/SI
nótálaim/I
nótálainn/J
ofrálaim/UI
pacálaim/USI
paidhceálaim/USI
paisteálaim/USI
parsálaim/USI
pasálaim/USI
phacálainn/JU
phaisteálainn/JU
phasálainn/JU
phionnálainn/JU
phleanálainn/JU
phlánálainn/JU
phlátálainn/JU
phléatálainn/JU
phointeálainn/JU
phramsálainn/JU
phreasálainn/JU
phrásálainn/JU
phróiseálainn/JU
phumpálainn/JU
pháirceálainn/JU
phéinteálainn/JU
phíceálainn/JU
phíosálainn/JU
phóitseálainn/JU
piardálaim/USI
pionnálaim/USI
plandálaim/USI
pleanálaim/USI
plugálaim/USI
plánálaim/USI
plástrálaim/USI
plátálaim/USI
pléatálaim/USI
pocálaim/USI
pointeálaim/USI
postálaim/USI
prapálaim/USI
priontálaim/USI
prímeálaim/USI
puinseálaim/USI
pábhálaim/USI
pánálaim/USI
péireálaim/USI
píopálaim/USI
póirseálaim/USI
púdrálaim/USI
raiceálainn/J
raighdeálaim/I
raonálainn/J
reáchtálaim/I
rialálainn/J
riastálaim/I
rigeálainn/J
rindreálaim/I
rinseálainn/J
robálaim/I
rollálainn/J
rácálaim/I
rásálaim/I
rásálainn/J
rátálaim/I
rútálainn/J
sacálaim/SI
saibhseálainn/J
saighneálaim/SI
samplálainn/J
scabhtálaim/I
scarbhálainn/J
sceitseálaim/I
scimeálainn/J
scinceálaim/I
sciortálainn/J
scipeálaim/I
sciálainn/J
sciúrsálaim/I
scolbálainn/J
scrioblálaim/I
scriúálainn/J
scroblálaim/I
scrábálainn/J
scuaideálaim/I
scuitseálainn/J
scátálaim/I
scórálainn/J
seansálaim/SI
seiceálainn/J
seirbheálaim/SI
shacálainn/J
shaighneálainn/J
sheansálainn/J
sheirbheálainn/J
shlatálainn/J
shlámálainn/J
shuiteálainn/J
shábhálainn/J
shóinseálainn/J
shótálainn/J
shúmálainn/J
slatálaim/SI
slatálainn/J
slámálaim/SI
slámálainn/J
smiotálaim/I
smiotálainn/J
smuigleálaim/I
smuigleálainn/J
spladhsálaim/I
spladhsálainn/J
spágálaim/I
spágálainn/J
spásálaim/I
spásálainn/J
spúinseálaim/I
spúinseálainn/J
straeálaim/I
straeálainn/J
strapálaim/I
strapálainn/J
stumpálaim/I
stumpálainn/J
stáirseálaim/I
stáirseálainn/J
stíleálaim/I
stíleálainn/J
stórálaim/I
stórálainn/J
suiteálaim/SI
suiteálainn/J
sábhálaim/SI
sábhálainn/J
sóinseálaim/SI
sóinseálainn/J
sótálaim/SI
sótálainn/J
súmálaim/SI
súmálainn/J
tapálaim/USI
tarrálaim/USI
thapálainn/JU
tharrálainn/JU
thiargálainn/JU
thointeálainn/JU
thraenálainn/JU
threorálainn/JU
thruipeálainn/JU
thrádálainn/JU
thuairteálainn/JU
thástálainn/JU
thíálainn/JU
tiargálaim/USI
tointeálaim/USI
traenálaim/USI
treorálaim/USI
truipeálaim/USI
trádálaim/USI
tuairteálaim/USI
tástálaim/USI
tíálaim/USI
uaslódálaim/UI
uaslódálainn/J
válsálaim/I
válsálainn/J
vótálaim/I
vótálainn/J
íoslódálaim/UI
íoslódálainn/J
